Vermont, session 2025-2026, S308.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 5830e is amended to read:
§ 5830e. RETIREMENT INCOME; SOCIAL SECURITY INCOME
* * *
(d) U.S. military retirement income and U.S. military survivor benefit
income. For taxpayers of any filing status, U.S. military retirement income,
and U.S. military survivor benefit income received by an eligible beneficiary,
received by a taxpayer of this State shall be excluded from taxable income
under subdivision 5811(21)(B)(iv) of this chapter as follows:
VT LEG #385844 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.308
2026 Page 2 of 3
(1) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $125,000.00, all federally taxable U.S. military retirement income and
survivor benefit income shall be excluded.
(2) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater than
$125,000.00 but less than $175,000.00, the percentage of federally taxable
U.S. military retirement income and survivor benefit income to be excluded
shall be proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s federal adjusted gross
income over $125,000.00, determined by:
(A) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $175,000.00;
(B) dividing the value under subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2)
by $50,000.00; and
(C) multiplying the value under subdivision (B) of this subdivision
(2) by the federally taxable U.S. military retirement income and survivor
benefit income received.
(3) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $175,000.00, no amount of the federally taxable U.S. military
retirement income and survivor benefit income received shall be excluded
under this section.
* * *
VT LEG #385844 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.308
2026 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, this act shall take effect retroactively on
January 1, 2026, and apply to taxable years beginning on and after January 1,
2026.
VT LEG #385844 v.1